Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-154.01
Motor Vehicle
Fraud Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The
Motor Vehicle Fraud Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be maintained by
the Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General. The fund
shall consist of revenue credited pursuant to section 60-154. The fund shall
only be used by the Department of Justice for expenses incurred and related
to (1) the investigation and prosecution of odometer and motor vehicle fraud
and motor vehicle licensing violations which may be referred by the Nebraska
Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board and (2) the investigation and prosecution
of fraud relating to and theft of all-terrain vehicles, utility-type vehicles, and minibikes. Expenditures
from the fund shall be approved by the Attorney General as authorized by law.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2006, LB 1061, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 16.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.